Illinois, session 104th, SB3566.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-805 and by adding Section 3-805.1 as 6follows: 7    (625 ILCS 5/3-805)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-805)8    Sec. 3-805. Electric vehicles. 9    (a) The owner of a motor vehicle of the first division or a 10motor vehicle of the second division weighing 8,000 pounds or 11less propelled by an electric engine and not utilizing motor 12fuel may register such vehicle for a registration fee equal to 13the fee set forth in Section 3-806 for motor vehicles of the 14first division, other than Autocycles, Motorcycles, Motor 15Driven Cycles, and Pedalcycles. In addition to the 16registration fees, the Secretary shall assess an additional 17$100 per year in lieu of the payment of motor fuel taxes. $1 of 18the additional fees shall be deposited into the Secretary of 19State Special Services Fund and the remainder of the 20additional fees shall be deposited into the Road Fund.21    (b) Beginning with the 2023 registration year and until 22July 1, 2027, upon the request of the vehicle owner, an 23electric vehicle owner may register an electric vehicle with   SB3566- 2 -LRB104 19944 LNS 33394 b1any qualifying registration issued under this Chapter, and an 2additional $100 surcharge shall be collected in addition to 3the applicable registration fee. The $100 additional fee is to 4identify the vehicle as an electric vehicle. The $100 5additional fee is an annual, flat fee that shall be based on an 6applicant's new or existing registration year for the 7vehicle's corresponding weight category. A designation as an 8electric vehicle under this subsection shall not alter a 9vehicle's registration. Of the additional fees, $1 shall be 10deposited into the Secretary of State Special Services Fund, 11and the remainder of the additional fees shall be deposited 12into the Road Fund. The Secretary shall adopt any rules 13necessary to implement this subsection (b). 14    (c) Beginning July 1, 2027, an electric vehicle owner may 15register an electric vehicle with any qualifying registration 16issued under this Chapter, and an additional $320 surcharge 17shall be collected in addition to the applicable registration 18fee. Of the additional fees, $1 shall be deposited into the 19Secretary of State Special Services Fund, and the remainder of 20the additional fees shall be deposited into the Road Fund. In 21lieu of the fee levied in this subsection, an electric vehicle 22owner may instead choose to enroll in the Road Usage Charge 23Program, as outlined in Section 3-805.1. The Secretary shall 24adopt any rules necessary to implement this subsection.25    (d) Beginning July 1, 2028, the Secretary of State shall 26annually adjust the electric vehicle registration surcharge as   SB3566- 3 -LRB104 19944 LNS 33394 b1described in subsection (c) by an amount equal to the 2percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for 3the 12 months ending in March of the year in which the increase 4takes place. The percentage increase in the Consumer Price 5Index shall be calculated as follows:6        (1) Calculate the average Consumer Prices Index for 7    the full 12 months ending in March of the year in which the 8    increase takes place.9        (2) Calculate the average Consumer Price Index for the 10    full 12 months ending in March of the year immediately 11    preceding the year in which the increase takes place.12        (3) Calculate the percentage increase, if any, in the 13    current-year average determined under paragraph (1) over 14    the preceding-year average determined under paragraph (2).15    The rate shall be rounded to the nearest one-tenth of one 16cent. 17(Source: P.A. 101-32, eff. 6-28-19; 102-154, eff. 1-1-22.) 18    (625 ILCS 5/3-805.1 new)19    Sec. 3-805.1. Road Usage Charge Program.20    (a) As used in this Section:21    "Account manager" means an entity under contract with the 22Secretary of State to administer and manage the road usage 23charge program.24    "Electric vehicle" means any vehicle that is required to 25be registered under Section 3-805.  SB3566- 4 -LRB104 19944 LNS 33394 b1    "Payment period" means the interval during which an owner 2is required to report mileage and pay the appropriate road 3usage charge according to the terms of the Program.4    "Program" means the Road Usage Charge Program established 5and described in this Section.6    "Road usage charge cap" means the maximum fee charged to a 7participant in the Program for a registration period.8    "Road usage charge rate" means the per-mile usage fee 9charged to a participant in the Program.10    (b) There is established the Road Usage Charge Program.11    (c) Beginning July 1, 2027, the Secretary of State shall 12implement and oversee the administration of the Program. To 13implement and administer the Program, the Secretary of State 14may contract with an account manager.15    (d) The owner of an electric vehicle may apply for 16enrollment of the electric vehicle in the Program. If an 17application for enrollment into the Program is approved by the 18Secretary of State, the owner of an electric vehicle may 19participate in the Program in lieu of paying the fee described 20in subsection (c) of Section 3-805.21    (e) The Secretary of State shall adopt rules to establish:22        (1) processes and terms for enrollment into and 23    withdrawal or removal from the Program;24        (2) payment periods and other payment methods and 25    procedures for the Program;26        (3) standards for mileage reporting mechanisms for an   SB3566- 5 -LRB104 19944 LNS 33394 b1    owner of an electric vehicle to report mileage as part of 2    participation in the Program;3        (4) standards for Program functions for mileage 4    recording, payment processing, account management, and 5    other similar aspects of the Program;6        (5) contractual terms between an owner of an electric 7    vehicle and an account manager for participation in the 8    Program;9        (6) contractual terms between the Secretary of State 10    and an account manager, including authority for an account 11    manager to enforce the terms of the Program;12        (7) procedures to provide security and protection of 13    personal information and data connected to the Program, 14    and penalties for account managers for violating privacy 15    protection rules;16        (8) penalty procedures for a Program participant's 17    failure to pay a road usage charge or tamper with a device 18    necessary for the Program;19        (9) oversight of an account manager, including privacy 20    protection of personal information and access and auditing 21    capability of financial and other record related to 22    administration of the Program; and23        (10) a process for collection of an unpaid road usage 24    charge or penalty.25    (f) The Secretary of State may impose a penalty for 26failure to timely pay a road usage charge according to the   SB3566- 6 -LRB104 19944 LNS 33394 b1terms of the Program or tampering with a device necessary for 2the Program. The Secretary of State may place a hold on the 3registration of the owner's electric vehicle for failure to 4pay a road usage charge or penalty according to the terms of 5the Program.6    (g) The Secretary of State may send correspondence to the 7owner of an electric vehicle to inform the owner of:8        (1) the Program, implementation of the Program, and 9    procedures of the Program;10        (2) an unpaid road usage charge and the amount of the 11    road usage charge to be paid to the Secretary of State;12        (3) the penalty for failure to pay a road usage charge 13    within the period laid out in the terms of the Program; and14        (4) a hold being placed on the owner's registration 15    for the electric vehicle, if the road usage charge and 16    penalty are not paid within the period laid out in the 17    terms of the Program that would prevent the renewal of the 18    electric vehicles registration.19    (h) If enrolled in the Program, the owner of an electric 20vehicle shall:21        (1) report mileage driven as required by the Secretary 22    of State under subsection (e);23        (2) pay the road usage fee for each payment period in 24    accordance with subsection (e); and25        (3) comply with all other provisions of this Section 26    and other requirements of the Program.  SB3566- 7 -LRB104 19944 LNS 33394 b1    (i) Beginning July 1, 2027, the road usage charge rate is 21.5 cent per mile and the road usage charge cap is $320 for an 3annual registration.4    (j) Beginning July 1, 2028, the Secretary of State shall 5annually adjust the road usage charge rate and the road usage 6charge cap as described in this subsection by an amount equal 7to the percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price 8Index for the 12 months ending in March of the year in which 9the increase takes place. The percentage increase in the 10Consumer Price Index shall be calculated as follows:11        (1) Calculate the average Consumer Prices Index for 12    the full 12 months ending in March of the year in which the 13    increase takes place.14        (2) Calculate the average Consumer Price Index for the 15    full 12 months ending in March of the year immediately 16    preceding the year in which the increase takes place.17        (3) Calculate the percentage increase, if any, in the 18    current-year average determined under paragraph (1) over 19    the preceding-year average determined under paragraph (2).20    The rate shall be rounded to the nearest one-tenth of one 21cent.22    (k) Revenue generated by the Program and relevant 23penalties shall be distributed in the same manner revenue from 24the motor fuel tax is distributed as outlined in subsection 25(e) of Section 8 of the Motor Fuel Tax Law after covering the 26costs to administer the Program.